District of Columbia statutes.
16-2824

Attendance at mediation session.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “a representative with settlement authority” means an individual with control of the financial settlement resources for the case and the authority to pledge those resources to settle the case on behalf of a party.

(b)

All parties shall personally attend mediation sessions.

(c)

If a party is not an individual, a representative with settlement authority for the party shall attend the mediation session.

(d)

In cases involving an insurance company, a representative of the company with settlement authority shall attend the mediation session.

(e)

Attorneys representing each party with primary responsibility for the case shall attend the mediation session.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807

History